Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 10
VETERINARY EDUCATION LOAN
REPAYMENT PROGRAM

23-31-1001. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and determines that:

More than one-third of rural communities in Colorado have at most one livestock-oriented veterinarian, thus leaving the owners of hundreds of thousands of livestock with little or no access to veterinary medicine;

Food security and safety are directly linked to animal health;

Colorado plays a key role in meeting our growing population's increasing demand for protein;

According to nationwide market statistics developed for the American Veterinary Medical Association, less than five percent of veterinarians in the United States practice predominantly on livestock;

Rural veterinarians play a critical role in protecting the health of animals and humans;

Many graduates of Colorado state university's college of veterinary medicine and biomedical sciences were raised in rural areas and are interested in livestock-oriented practice; however, these graduates often feel limited to practice in areas of the state with higher starting salaries due to their loan repayment obligations; and

Loan forgiveness and repayment programs in other states have improved veterinarians' ability to pursue veterinary practices in rural areas.

Therefore, the general assembly determines and declares that a veterinary education loan repayment program would benefit Colorado by providing financial incentives for veterinarians to practice in rural areas in which veterinary needs are not currently being met.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1282), ch. 322, p. 1733, § 1, effective August 9.

23-31-1002. Definitions.

As used in this part 10, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Council" means the state veterinary education loan repayment council created in section 23-31-1003.

"Licensed veterinarian" has the same meaning as set forth in section 12-315-104 (11).

"Program" means the state veterinary education loan repayment program created in section 23-31-1004.

"Rural" means:

A county with a population of fewer than thirty thousand; or

A municipality with a population of fewer than twenty thousand if the municipality is not contiguous to a municipality with a population of twenty thousand or more.

"Veterinarian" has the same meaning as set forth in section 12-315-104 (18).

"Veterinary shortage area" means a rural area that the council determines has a shortage of veterinarians practicing in the area.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1282), ch. 322, p. 1734, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(2) and (5) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1684, § 121, effective October 1.

23-31-1003. State veterinary education loan repayment council - creation - membership.

There is hereby created in Colorado state university's college of veterinary medicine and biomedical sciences the veterinary education loan repayment council, referred to in this part 10 as the "council". The council shall be under the direct supervision of the dean of Colorado state university's college of veterinary medicine and biomedical sciences or the dean's designee. The dean or the dean's designee may authorize staff assistance to provide administrative support for the council if such staff assistance can be provided within Colorado state university's existing appropriations.

The council consists of five directors appointed by the governor. A director of the council:

Must not be an elected official;

May serve up to three consecutive terms; and

Shall not receive compensation for his or her membership on the council but may be reimbursed for any necessary and reasonable expenses incurred while performing his or her duties as a director of the council.

The governor shall appoint the following representatives to the council:

At least one director who is a member of the faculty or staff of Colorado state university's college of veterinary medicine and biomedical sciences;

The commissioner of agriculture or the commissioner's designee;

At least one director who is associated with, and able to represent the interests of, the Colorado livestock industries; and

At least one director who is associated with, and able to represent the interests of, the Colorado Veterinary Medical Association or a successor organization.

Directors are appointed for terms of four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than three directors' terms expire in the same year.

Unless extenuating circumstances such as illness or death require otherwise, each director shall hold office until the director's successor is appointed.

The governor, at the governor's pleasure, may remove a director of the council at any time. If a director vacates the director's seat on the council during the term for which the director was appointed, the governor shall fill the resultant vacancy by appointing a director for the remainder of that term. The successor director must meet the same qualifications under this section as the successor's predecessor.

At the first meeting of the council, and as necessary thereafter, the directors shall appoint from their membership a chair and vice-chair of the council, who have joint authority over the council's financial matters, including loan repayment authorizations based on the council's approval of loan repayment applications.

Pursuant to section 24-6-402, the council shall conduct all business at regular or special meetings that are open to the public. The council shall meet as often as necessary to perform its duties under this part 10.

Council action requires the affirmative vote of a majority of the total membership of the council.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1282), ch. 322, p. 1734, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

(2)(b) and (3) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 34, § 44, effective February 25.

23-31-1004. State veterinary education loan repayment program - creation - purpose.

The council shall administer the veterinary education loan repayment program to provide financial incentives to licensed veterinarians to practice veterinary medicine in veterinary shortage areas of the state through assistance with the repayment of veterinary education loans.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1282), ch. 322, p. 1736, § 1, effective August 9.

23-31-1005. Council powers and duties.

To implement this part 10, the council shall:

Pursuant to the criteria set forth in section 23-31-1006, determine the eligibility and qualifications of an applicant for loan repayment under the program;

With respect to the veterinary shortage areas that are in need of veterinary medical services:

Identify and designate the veterinary shortage areas that will participate in the program pursuant to the criteria established by the council as set forth in section 23-31-1007;

Establish a priority ranking for the designated veterinary shortage areas participating in the program based on level of need; and

Annually update the list of designated veterinary shortage areas and the priority rankings;

In accordance with the maximum amounts set forth in section 23-31-1009, determine the amount of loan repayment money to which an applicant selected under the program is eligible, based on the unpaid amount of any outstanding education loan that meets the criteria set forth in section 23-31-1006 (2); and

Upon selecting an applicant, enter into a renewable contract with the selected applicant and the designated veterinary shortage area to which the selected applicant has been matched to provide loan repayment money on the selected applicant's behalf in exchange for the selected applicant's agreement to actively practice veterinary medicine in the veterinary shortage area.

In furtherance of its duties under this part 10, the council may:

Receive and use money appropriated for or donated to the program to be used in furtherance of the program;

With respect to any contract that the council has entered into with a selected applicant and a designated veterinary shortage area under the program:

Enforce the contract; or

Cancel the contract for good cause based on a determination that the applicant is not complying with the terms of the contract;

Monitor federal programs that support the repayment of education loans incurred by veterinarians; and

Accept property from another entity to be used in furtherance of the program.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1282), ch. 322, p. 1736, § 1, effective August 9.

23-31-1006. Program applicant eligibility - criteria.

Each year, the council shall select up to four qualified veterinarian applicants to participate in the program. The number of applicants that the council may choose in a given year is dependent on the amount of money available in that year for the council to award under the program.

To be eligible for repayment under the program, an applicant must:

Be a licensed veterinarian who:

Agrees, in the form and manner determined by the council, to practice veterinary medicine in a veterinary shortage area, as designated by the council pursuant to section 23-31-1007; and

Graduated from an accredited doctor of veterinary medicine school in 2017 or later;

Currently live in Colorado or, at some point, have lived in Colorado for at least three years; and

Have an outstanding education loan:

That was incurred in relation to the applicant's attendance at an accredited doctor of veterinary medicine school located in the United States;

For which the applicant is not in default; and

That has not been consolidated with any loans incurred by a spouse.

An applicant selected for loan repayment under the program:

Is eligible for an amount:

Up to seventy thousand dollars pursuant to the maximum yearly repayment amounts set forth in section 23-31-1009; and

That correlates to the applicant's outstanding veterinary education loans;

Shall contract with the council to provide veterinary medical services in one or more designated veterinary shortage areas for a period up to four years.

In establishing the applicant eligibility criteria for loan repayment under the program, the council shall consider the following factors with respect to the applicant's compatibility with a designated veterinary shortage area:

An applicant's training with respect to, ability to provide, and willingness to engage in, food animal veterinary medicine and the extent to which the designated veterinary shortage area needs food animal veterinary medical services;

An applicant's commitment to practice veterinary medicine in the designated veterinary shortage area;

An applicant's date of availability to practice veterinary medicine in the designated veterinary shortage area; and

An applicant's competence, as determined by the state board of veterinary medicine created in section 12-315-106, and ability to fulfill the duties identified in the application.

The council shall give priority to eligible applicants who:

Have graduated from Colorado state university's college of veterinary medicine and biomedical sciences; and

With respect to a designated veterinary shortage area:

Have lived in the veterinary shortage area or a nearby area;

Have family in the veterinary shortage area or a nearby area; or

Live, or have lived, in a substantially similar rural area of the state.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1282), ch. 322, p. 1737, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(4)(d) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1685, § 122, effective October 1.

23-31-1007. Designated veterinary shortage areas - criteria.

In designating a community a veterinary shortage area, the council shall consider:

The veterinary service needs identified by the community, giving priority to communities that demonstrate the potential for significant negative food animal health impacts within Colorado if their veterinary service needs are not met;

The number of veterinarians practicing in the community and its surrounding area;

The existing access residents of the community and its surrounding areas have to veterinary services; and

The degree to which residents or livestock producers support the addition of a veterinarian within the community.

For communities that the council identifies as veterinary shortage areas based on their demonstrated need for veterinary services, the council, in designating which veterinary shortage areas to match with veterinarians through the program, shall prioritize the veterinary shortage areas based on their demonstrated level of need for veterinary services.

In evaluating a veterinary shortage area to determine whether to designate the veterinary shortage area for participation in the program, the council may consult with public and private entities and visit the veterinary shortage area.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1282), ch. 322, p. 1738, § 1, effective August 9.

23-31-1008. Release from contract obligation.

The council shall release a veterinarian selected for repayment under the program from his or her veterinary loan repayment contract without penalty if:

The veterinarian has completed the service requirements of the contract;

The veterinarian is unable to complete the service requirement of the contract because of a permanent physical disability;

The veterinarian demonstrates to the council extreme hardship or other good cause justifying release from the contract; or

The veterinarian dies.

A decision by the council not to release a veterinarian from the veterinarian's loan repayment contract without penalty is a final agency action that is reviewable by a district court.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1282), ch. 322, p. 1739, § 1, effective August 9.

23-31-1009. Loan repayment.

The council shall make all payments under the program on a veterinarian's behalf to the issuer or purchaser of the veterinarian's student loan.

As required by a selected veterinarian's contract under the program, the veterinarian is eligible for the following amounts of loan repayment:

Upon completion of six months of the first year of service under the program, ten thousand dollars;

Upon completion of a second year of service under the program, an additional fifteen thousand dollars;

Upon completion of a third year of service under the program, an additional twenty thousand dollars; and

Upon completion of a fourth year of service under the contract, an additional twenty-five thousand dollars.

A veterinarian is not entitled to receive more than seventy thousand dollars under the program.

If, for any of the years of service for which a veterinarian selected under the program is contracted to provide service, the veterinarian fails to complete the entire year of service, the council shall prorate the amount of loan repayment on the veterinarian's behalf for that year.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1282), ch. 322, p. 1739, § 1, effective August 9.

23-31-1010. Veterinary education loan repayment fund - creation - gifts, grants, and donations.

The veterinary education loan repayment fund, referred to in this part 10 as the "fund", is hereby created in the state treasury.

On September 1, 2017, the state treasurer shall transfer one hundred forty thousand dollars from the general fund to the fund.

The fund also consists of money credited to it pursuant to subsection (5) of this section and any additional money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund.

The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

The state treasurer shall credit any unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year to the fund.

Money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the council for implementation of the program under this part 10.

The council may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this part 10. The council shall transmit all money received through gifts, grants, or donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the fund.

The council may contract with a public or private entity and may expend money available to the council to obtain matching funds for the purpose of this part 10.

If an entity desires to provide a gift, grant, or donation of money to the council for the placement of a veterinarian in a specific veterinary shortage area, the entity shall commit to provide the full amount required under the program for placement of a veterinarian in that veterinary shortage area for four years.

For purposes of this subsection (5), "gifts, grants, or donations" include money from an endowment.

In accordance with section 24-75-402 (2)(a) and for each fiscal year, the alternative maximum reserve for the fund is thirty-three and three-tenths percent of the amount expended from the fund during the fiscal year.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1282), ch. 322, p. 1740, § 1, effective August 9.